District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-3930

Filing false document or evidence; false statements.

Repealed.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-219, § 31, 38 DCR 171
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1242, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-3230.